Utah statutes.
53-6-208.   Inactive certificates -- Lapse of certificate -- Reinstatement.

(1) (a)  The certificate of a peace officer who has not been actively engaged in performing the duties of a peace officer for one year shall be designated "inactive."

(b)  If a peace officer having an inactive certificate becomes reemployed or subsequently reengaged as a peace officer, his certificate may be reissued or reinstated by the director upon successful completion by that peace officer of the waiver process established by the director.

(c)  The director may require a peace officer with an inactive certificate to successfully complete the basic training course before reissuing or reinstating certification.

(2) (a)  The certificate of a peace officer lapses if he has not been actively engaged in performing the duties of a peace officer for four continuous years.

(b)  Subject to Section 53-6-206, the peace officer shall successfully complete the basic training course before the certificate may be reissued or reinstated.

